Utah statutes.
76-2-404.   Peace officer's use of deadly force.
(1)  A peace officer, or any person acting by his command in his aid and
assistance, is justified in using deadly force when:
(a)  the officer is acting in obedience to and in accordance with the judgment
of a competent court in executing a penalty of death under Subsection
77-18-5.5(3) or (4);
(b)  effecting an arrest or preventing an escape from custody following an
arrest, where the officer reasonably believes that deadly force is necessary
to prevent the arrest from being defeated by escape; and
(i)  the officer has probable cause to believe that the suspect has committed
a felony offense involving the infliction or threatened infliction of death or
serious bodily injury; or
(ii)  the officer has probable cause to believe the suspect poses a threat of
death or serious bodily injury to the officer or to others if apprehension is
delayed; or
(c)  the officer reasonably believes that the use of deadly force is necessary
to prevent death or serious bodily injury to the officer or another person.
(2)  If feasible, a verbal warning should be given by the officer prior to any
use of deadly force under Subsection (1)(b) or (1)(c).
